Utah statutes.
73-10-5.   Selection of project by board -- Preparation of plans and
estimate of cost -- Contracts by board.
When a project to be constructed with money made available from the funds
created by Section 73-10-8 has been selected by the board, which in its
opinion, will conserve the water resources of this state for the best
interests of the citizens of the state, the board shall cause plans and cost
estimates of such project to be prepared. Such plans and cost estimates shall
then be referred to the director of the Division of Finance who shall
determine whether or not funds are available for the construction of the
project. If the director of the Division of Finance approves the project so
far as the availability of funds is concerned, the Utah water and power board
shall then enter into a contract or contracts for the construction of the
project. Such contracts shall not be binding upon the state until approved by
the director of the Division of Finance from the standpoint of whether or not
the cost of the work is reasonable and whether the contract has been entered
into under the terms and conditions most advantageous to the state.
